Connecticut, session 2026, SB00418.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective from passage) The Commissioner of Energy and
Environmental Protection shall (1) develop a framework for allowing
third-party qualified professionals to conduct permit review and make
permit decision recommendations to the Department of Energy and
Environmental Protection, including, but not limited to, eligibility
criteria, certification standards and oversight mechanisms, and (2)
conduct a review of all permits that are within the commissioner's
jurisdiction for the purpose of determining which permits may be
lawfully delegated to third-party qualified professionals for purposes of
permit review and to make permit decision recommendations to the
department. The commissioner shall, not later than December 31, 2027,
report, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general
statutes, to the joint standing committees of the General Assembly
having cognizance of matters relating to commerce and the
environment regarding such framework and review.
LCO No. 2736 1 of 2

Raised Bill No. 418
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section